District of Columbia statutes.
50-921

Regulations.

The Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles may amend the regulations promulgated pursuant to Regulation No. 72-13, effective June 30, 1972, that were published in Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations and are now contained in chapters 1 through 10 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, and those amendments contained in the provisions of the Motor Vehicle and Safe Driving Amendment Act of 2000, effective April 27, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-289; 48 DCR 2057 ). Regulations promulgated or amended pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of Council review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess. If within the 45-day period, a resolution of disapproval has been introduced by 3 members of the Council, the regulations shall not be deemed approved.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 801, 48 DCR 2057
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 82, 52 DCR 2638
D.C. Law 15-354 validated a previously made technical correction.

Resolution 15-736, the “Commercial Driver’s License Rulemaking Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective November 9, 2004.

Resolution 15-738, the “Special Use Identification Tag Rulemaking Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective November 9, 2004.

Resolution 16-351, the “Driver License and Reciprocity Application Rulemaking Disapproval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective November 1, 2005.